Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6021YH (2) 91 lh/jh H.F. 2436 Section 1. Section 598.37, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 598.37 Name change. 3 1. a. Either party to a marriage may request as a part of 4 the decree of dissolution or decree of annulment a change in 5 the personâs name to either the name appearing on the personâs 6 birth certificate or to the name the person had immediately 7 prior to the marriage. 8 b. If a party requests a name change other than to the name 9 appearing on the personâs birth certificate or to the name the 10 person had immediately prior to the marriage, the request shall 11 be made under chapter 674 . 12 2. If a party requests a name change under subsection 13 1, paragraph âaâ , the clerk of court shall issue a separate 14 document evidencing the name change. The document shall 15 not contain any other information relating to the decree of 16 dissolution or decree of annulment. 17